District of Columbia statutes.
22-3227.06

Jurisdiction.

The offense of identity theft shall be deemed to be committed in the District of Columbia, regardless of whether the offender is physically present in the District of Columbia, if:

(1)

The person whose personal identifying information is improperly obtained, created, possessed, or used is a resident of, or located in, the District of Columbia; or

(2)

Any part of the offense takes place in the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 127f
as added Mar. 27, 2004, D.C. Law 15-106, § 2(c), 50 DCR 9809
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 214(l), 56 DCR 7413

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-88, in par. (1), substituted “resident of, or located in,” for “resident of”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Identity Thief Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-388, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3382).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(k) of Crime Bill Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-129, June 29, 2009, 56 DCR 5495).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(l) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(l) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).